Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3004
Director; powers and duties.

The director shall have the power to issue to corporations desiring to transact business as a digital asset depository institution charters to transact digital asset depository business as defined in the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act. The director shall have general supervision and control over such digital asset depositories.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 21.